Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 350.075, as amended by section 5,  chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2016, and section
55, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
350.075. (1) As  used in this section, “student access programs” means scholarship, loan, grant
and access programs described in ORS chapter 348.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be guided by the legislative findings
in ORS 341.009, 350.001 and 350.005 and the  goals and mission of post-secondary education set forth
in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Develop  state goals for the state post-secondary education system, including community col-
leges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and for student access programs.
(b) Determine strategic investments  in the state’s community colleges, public universities and
student access programs necessary to achieve state post-secondary education goals.
(c) Coordinate the post-secondary elements of data collection and structure, with the advice  and
recommendation of the state’s independent institutions, community  colleges and public universities,
as appropriate, in order to construct a state longitudinal data system.
(d) Adopt a strategic plan  for achieving state post-secondary education goals, taking into con-
sideration the contributions  of this state’s independent institutions, philanthropic organizations and
other organizations  dedicated to helping Oregonians reach state goals. State post-secondary educa-
tion goals as described in this section should include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Increasing the educational attainment of the population;
(B) Increasing this state’s global  economic competitiveness and the quality of life of its resi-
dents;
(C) Ensuring  affordable access for qualified Oregon students at each college or public university;
(D) Removing barriers to on-time completion; and
(E) Tracking progress toward meeting  the state’s post-secondary education goals established in
the strategic plan described in this paragraph.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 1
(e)(A) Each biennium, after receiving funding requests from  the state’s community colleges and
public universities as authorized by law, recommend to the Governor  a consolidated higher educa-
tion agency request budget aligned with the strategic plan described in paragraph (d) of this  sub-
section, including appropriations for:
(i) Student access programs;
(ii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002, including but not limited  to education and general
operations, statewide public services and state-funded debt service;
(iii) Community colleges, including  but not limited to education and general operations and
state-funded debt service;
(iv) New facilities or programs;
(v) Capital improvements and deferred maintenance; [ and]
(vi) Special initiatives and investments ; and
(vii) Any other program, duty or function a public  university listed in ORS 352.002 is
authorized to undertake .
(B) In the development of the consolidated higher education agency request budget:
(i) Determine the costs necessary to provide quality post-secondary education;
(ii) Solicit input from educators, education policy  experts, appropriate legislative committees,
students and other persons interested in the development of the funding model; and
(iii) Solicit public input regarding educational priorities.
(f) Adopt rules governing the distribution of appropriations from the  Legislative Assembly to
community colleges, public universities  listed in ORS 352.002 and student access programs. These
rules must be based on allocation formulas developed in consultation with the state’s  community
colleges and public universities, as appropriate.
(g) Approve or  disapprove any significant change to the academic program of a community col-
lege or a public university listed in ORS 352.002. In reaching a decision under this paragraph,  the
commission shall consider the  recommendation from the community college or public university
seeking to  make the change to an academic program that is issued pursuant to the obligation of the
governing board of a community college or public university to  review and approve academic pro-
grams. The commission shall ensure that approved programs:
(A) Are consistent with the mission statement of the community college or public university;
(B) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic  programs offered by Oregon’s other community
colleges or public universities;
(C) Are not located in a geographic area  that will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other
community colleges or public universities; and
(D) Are allocated among Oregon’s community colleges and  public universities to maximize the
achievement of statewide needs and requirements.
(h) For public universities listed in ORS 352.002:
(A) Approve the mission statement adopted by a governing board of a public university.
(B) Review and determine whether a proposed annual increase  of resident undergraduate en-
rollment fees of greater than five percent is appropriate.
(C) Advise the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on issues of university governance.
(D) Approve and authorize degrees.
(E) Perform the evaluation and certification required by ORS 350.095.
(i) Authorize degrees to be offered by independent  post-secondary institutions in this state under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615.
(j) Oversee the licensing of career schools under ORS 345.010 to 345.450.
(k) Have the  authority to enter into and administer interstate agreements regarding the pro-
vision of post-secondary distance education. The participation by an educational institution  that is
not based in this state in distance learning courses or programs that are part of  an interstate
agreement entered into and administered under this paragraph  does not constitute operating in this
state for  purposes of ORS 348.594 to 348.615. The commission, by rule, may impose a fee on any
educational institution that seeks to operate under or  participate in such interstate agreements. The
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 2
fee amount shall be established to recover designated expenses incurred by the  commission in par-
ticipating in such agreements.
(L) Coordinate and collaborate  with the Chief Education Office as provided by section 1, chapter
519, Oregon Laws 2011.
(4)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall implement a process  to resolve
student complaints against any  school operating in this state. As part of the process implemented
under this subsection, the commission may:
(A) Receive student complaints from students regarding a school;
(B) Specify the type of information that must be included in a student complaint;
(C) Investigate any student complaint filed against a school;
(D) Establish a process to review and resolve student complaints against a school, including but
not limited to reviewing school records, holding administrative hearings and issuing final orders;
(E) Assess a fee  to cover the costs of any proceeding brought under this subsection, including
but not limited to the costs of an investigation or administrative hearing;
(F) Require a school to make full or partial restitution to a student or to cease an act or  prac-
tice that is challenged in a student complaint;
(G) Adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection; and
(H) Enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) Any hearing held under this subsection is subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “School” means a school that meets the requirements of ORS 348.597 (2)(a); and
(B) “Student” means a person who is enrolled or accepted for  enrollment at a school for the
purpose of obtaining a degree, certificate or other  recognized educational credential offered by that
school.
(5) In addition to the duties described in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission shall advise the Legislative Assembly, the  Governor, community
colleges, public universities and other state boards and commissions on policies in order to:
(a) Ensure or improve access to higher education by diverse and underserved populations.
(b) Encourage student success and completion initiatives.
(c) Improve the coordination of the provision of educational services, including:
(A) Transfers and coenrollment throughout the higher education system;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs for high school students;
(C) Applied baccalaureate and other transfer degrees;
(D) Programs and grants that span multiple institutions; and
(E) Reciprocity agreements with other states.
(d) In coordination with the State Board of Education, enhance the  use and quality of dual
credit, career and technical pathways and efforts  to create a culture of college attendance in this
state.
(e) In coordination with the State  Workforce Investment Board, local workforce investment
boards, the Oregon Health and Science  University and independent institutions, ensure that the
state’s colleges and universities offer programs in high-demand occupations that meet  Oregon’s
workforce needs.
(f) Improve economies of scale by encouraging and facilitating the  use of the shared services
among post-secondary institutions in this state.
(6) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in  a manner consistent with ORS chapter
183, may adopt administrative rules.
(7) With the exception of the rulemaking authority granted in subsection (6) of  this section, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission may  delegate any of its powers, duties or functions to
a committee of the commission or to the executive director of the commission.
[(8) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may establish technical or  advisory commit-
tees to assist the commission in exercising its powers, duties and functions. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 3
[(9)] (8)  The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission may exercise only powers, duties and
functions expressly granted by the Legislative  Assembly. Except as otherwise expressly provided by
law, all other authorities reside at the institutional level with the respective  boards of the post-
secondary institutions.
SECTION 2.  ORS 350.075, as amended by section 61, chapter 774, Oregon Laws  2015, section
6, chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2016, and section 56, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended  to
read:
350.075. (1) As  used in this section, “student access programs” means scholarship, loan, grant
and access programs described in ORS chapter 348.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be guided by the legislative findings
in ORS 341.009, 350.001 and 350.005 and the  goals and mission of post-secondary education set forth
in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Develop  state goals for the state post-secondary education system, including community col-
leges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and for student access programs.
(b) Determine strategic investments  in the state’s community colleges, public universities and
student access programs necessary to achieve state post-secondary education goals.
(c) Coordinate the post-secondary elements of data collection and structure, with the advice  and
recommendation of the state’s independent institutions, community  colleges and public universities,
as appropriate, in order to construct a state longitudinal data system.
(d) Adopt a strategic plan  for achieving state post-secondary education goals, taking into con-
sideration the contributions  of this state’s independent institutions, philanthropic organizations and
other organizations  dedicated to helping Oregonians reach state goals. State post-secondary educa-
tion goals as described in this section should include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Increasing the educational attainment of the population;
(B) Increasing this state’s global  economic competitiveness and the quality of life of its resi-
dents;
(C) Ensuring  affordable access for qualified Oregon students at each college or public university;
(D) Removing barriers to on-time completion; and
(E) Tracking progress toward meeting  the state’s post-secondary education goals established in
the strategic plan described in this paragraph.
(e)(A) Each biennium, after receiving funding requests from  the state’s community colleges and
public universities as authorized by law, recommend to the Governor  a consolidated higher educa-
tion agency request budget aligned with the strategic plan described in paragraph (d) of this  sub-
section, including appropriations for:
(i) Student access programs;
(ii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002, including but not limited  to education and general
operations, statewide public services and state-funded debt service;
(iii) Community colleges, including but not limited to education and  general operations and
state-funded debt service;
(iv) New facilities or programs;
(v) Capital improvements and deferred maintenance; [ and]
(vi) Special initiatives and investments ; and
(vii) Any other program, duty or function  a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is
authorized to undertake .
(B) In the development of the consolidated higher education agency request budget:
(i) Determine the costs necessary to provide quality post-secondary education;
(ii) Solicit input from educators,  education policy experts, appropriate legislative committees,
students and other persons interested in the development of the funding model; and
(iii) Solicit public input regarding educational priorities.
(f) Adopt rules governing  the distribution of appropriations from the Legislative Assembly to
community colleges, public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and student access  programs. These
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 4
rules must  be based on allocation formulas developed in consultation with the state’s community
colleges and public universities, as appropriate.
(g) Approve or  disapprove any significant change to the academic program of a community col-
lege or a public university listed in ORS 352.002. In reaching a decision under this paragraph,  the
commission shall consider the  recommendation from the community college or public university
seeking to  make the change to an academic program that is issued pursuant to the obligation of the
governing board of a community college or public university to  review and approve academic pro-
grams. The commission shall ensure that approved programs:
(A) Are consistent with the mission statement of the community college or public university;
(B) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic  programs offered by Oregon’s other community
colleges or public universities;
(C) Are not located in a geographic area  that will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other
community colleges or public universities; and
(D) Are allocated among Oregon’s community colleges and  public universities to maximize the
achievement of statewide needs and requirements.
(h) For public universities listed in ORS 352.002:
(A) Approve the mission statement adopted by a governing board of a public university.
(B) Review and determine whether a proposed annual increase  of resident undergraduate en-
rollment fees of greater than five percent is appropriate.
(C) Advise the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on issues of university governance.
(D) Approve and authorize degrees.
(E) Perform the evaluation and certification required by ORS 350.095.
(i) Authorize degrees to be offered by independent  post-secondary institutions in this state under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615.
(j) Oversee the licensing of career schools under ORS 345.010 to 345.450.
(k) Have the  authority to enter into and administer interstate agreements regarding the pro-
vision of post-secondary distance education. The participation by an educational institution  that is
not based in this state in distance learning courses or programs that are part of  an interstate
agreement entered into and administered under this paragraph  does not constitute operating in this
state for  purposes of ORS 348.594 to 348.615. The commission, by rule, may impose a fee on any
educational institution that seeks to operate under or  participate in such interstate agreements. The
fee amount shall be established to recover designated expenses incurred by the  commission in par-
ticipating in such agreements.
(4)(a) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission shall implement a process to resolve
student complaints against any school operating in this state. As part of  the process implemented
under this subsection, the commission may:
(A) Receive student complaints from students regarding a school;
(B) Specify the type of information that must be included in a student complaint;
(C) Investigate any student complaint filed against a school;
(D) Establish a process to review and resolve student complaints against a school, including but
not limited to reviewing school records, holding administrative hearings and issuing final orders;
(E) Assess a fee to cover the costs of any proceeding brought under  this subsection, including
but not limited to the costs of an investigation or administrative hearing;
(F) Require  a school to make full or partial restitution to a student or to cease an act or prac-
tice that is challenged in a student complaint;
(G) Adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection; and
(H) Enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) Any hearing held under this subsection is subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “School” means a school that meets the requirements of ORS 348.597 (2)(a); and
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 5
(B) “Student” means a person who is  enrolled or accepted for enrollment at a school for the
purpose of obtaining a degree, certificate or other  recognized educational credential offered by that
school.
(5) In addition to the duties described in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission  shall advise the Legislative Assembly, the Governor, community
colleges, public universities and other state boards and commissions on policies in order to:
(a) Ensure or improve access to higher education by diverse and underserved populations.
(b) Encourage student success and completion initiatives.
(c) Improve the coordination of the provision of educational services, including:
(A) Transfers and coenrollment throughout the higher education system;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs for high school students;
(C) Applied baccalaureate and other transfer degrees;
(D) Programs and grants that span multiple institutions; and
(E) Reciprocity agreements with other states.
(d) In coordination with the State  Board of Education, enhance the use and quality of dual
credit, career and technical pathways and efforts to create a  culture of college attendance in this
state.
(e) In coordination with the State Workforce  Investment Board, local workforce investment
boards, the Oregon Health and Science University and  independent institutions, ensure that the
state’s colleges  and universities offer programs in high-demand occupations that meet Oregon’s
workforce needs.
(f) Improve economies of scale by  encouraging and facilitating the use of the shared services
among post-secondary institutions in this state.
(6) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in  a manner consistent with ORS chapter
183, may adopt administrative rules.
(7) With the exception of the rulemaking authority granted in subsection (6) of  this section, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission may delegate any of its powers,  duties or functions to
a committee of the commission or to the executive director of the commission.
[(8) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission may establish technical or advisory commit-
tees to assist the commission in exercising its powers, duties and functions. ]
[(9)] (8)  The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may exercise only  powers, duties and
functions expressly granted by the Legislative  Assembly. Except as otherwise expressly provided by
law, all other authorities reside  at the institutional level with the respective boards of the post-
secondary institutions.
SECTION 2a.
If House Bill 2314 becomes law, section  1 of this 2017 Act (amending ORS
350.075) is repealed and ORS 350.075, as  amended by section 5, chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2016,
section 55, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, and section 7, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House Bill 2314), is amended to read:
350.075. (1) As  used in this section, “student access programs” means scholarship, loan, grant
and access programs described in ORS chapter 348.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be guided by the legislative findings
in ORS 341.009, 350.001 and 350.005 and the  goals and mission of post-secondary education set forth
in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Develop  state goals for the state post-secondary education system, including community col-
leges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and for student access programs.
(b) Determine strategic investments  in the state’s community colleges, public universities and
student access programs necessary to achieve state post-secondary education goals.
(c) Coordinate the post-secondary elements of data collection and structure, with the advice  and
recommendation of the state’s independent institutions, community  colleges and public universities,
as appropriate, in order to construct a state longitudinal data system.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 6
(d) Adopt a strategic plan  for achieving state post-secondary education goals, taking into con-
sideration the contributions  of this state’s independent institutions, philanthropic organizations and
other organizations  dedicated to helping Oregonians reach state goals. State post-secondary educa-
tion goals as described in this section should include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Increasing the educational attainment of the population;
(B) Increasing this state’s global  economic competitiveness and the quality of life of its resi-
dents;
(C) Ensuring  affordable access for qualified Oregon students at each college or public university;
(D) Removing barriers to on-time completion; and
(E) Tracking progress toward meeting  the state’s post-secondary education goals established in
the strategic plan described in this paragraph.
(e)(A) Each biennium, after receiving funding requests from  the state’s community colleges and
public universities as authorized by law, recommend to the Governor  a consolidated higher educa-
tion agency request budget aligned with the strategic plan described in paragraph (d) of this  sub-
section, including appropriations for:
(i) Student access programs;
(ii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002, including but not limited  to education and general
operations, statewide public services and state-funded debt service;
(iii) Community colleges, including but not limited to education and  general operations and
state-funded debt service;
(iv) New facilities or programs;
(v) Capital improvements and deferred maintenance; [ and]
(vi) Special initiatives and investments ; and
(vii) Any other program, duty or function  a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is
authorized to undertake .
(B) In the development of the consolidated higher education agency request budget:
(i) Determine the costs necessary to provide quality post-secondary education;
(ii) Solicit input from educators,  education policy experts, appropriate legislative committees,
students and other persons interested in the development of the funding model; and
(iii) Solicit public input regarding educational priorities.
(f) Adopt rules governing  the distribution of appropriations from the Legislative Assembly to
community colleges, public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and student access  programs. These
rules must  be based on allocation formulas developed in consultation with the state’s community
colleges and public universities, as appropriate.
(g) Approve or disapprove any significant change to the academic program of a  community col-
lege or  a public university listed in ORS 352.002. In reaching a decision under this paragraph, the
commission shall consider the recommendation from the community college  or public university
seeking to  make the change to an academic program that is issued pursuant to the obligation of the
governing board of a community college  or public university to review and approve academic pro-
grams. The commission shall ensure that approved programs:
(A) Are consistent with the mission statement of the community college or public university;
(B) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic programs  offered by Oregon’s other community
colleges or public universities;
(C) Are not located in a geographic area that  will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other
community colleges or public universities; and
(D) Are allocated among Oregon’s community  colleges and public universities to maximize the
achievement of statewide needs and requirements.
(h) For public universities listed in ORS 352.002:
(A) Approve the mission statement adopted by a governing board of a public university.
(B) Review and determine whether  a proposed annual increase of resident undergraduate en-
rollment fees of greater than five percent is appropriate.
(C) Advise the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on issues of university governance.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 7
(D) Approve and authorize degrees.
(E) Perform the evaluation and certification required by ORS 350.095.
(i) Authorize degrees to be offered by independent  post-secondary institutions in this state under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615.
(j) Oversee the licensing of career schools under ORS 345.010 to 345.450.
(k) Have the  authority to enter into and administer interstate agreements regarding the pro-
vision of post-secondary distance education. The participation by an educational institution  that is
not based in this state in distance learning courses or programs that are part of  an interstate
agreement entered into and administered under this paragraph  does not constitute operating in this
state for  purposes of ORS 348.594 to 348.615. The commission, by rule, may impose a fee on any
educational institution that seeks to operate under or  participate in such interstate agreements. The
fee amount shall be established to recover designated expenses incurred by the  commission in par-
ticipating in such agreements.
(L) Coordinate and collaborate  with the Chief Education Office as provided by section 1, chapter
519, Oregon Laws 2011.
(4)(a) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission shall implement a process to resolve
student complaints against any school operating in this state. As part of  the process implemented
under this subsection, the commission may:
(A) Receive student complaints from students regarding a school;
(B) Specify the type of information that must be included in a student complaint;
(C) Investigate any student complaint filed against a school;
(D) Establish a process to review and resolve student complaints against a school, including but
not limited to reviewing school records, holding administrative hearings and issuing final orders;
(E) Assess a fee to cover the costs of any proceeding brought under  this subsection, including
but not limited to the costs of an investigation or administrative hearing;
(F) Require  a school to make full or partial restitution to a student or to cease an act or prac-
tice that is challenged in a student complaint;
(G) Adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection; and
(H) Enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) Any hearing held under this subsection is subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “School” means a school that meets the requirements of ORS 348.597 (2)(a); and
(B) “Student” means a person who is  enrolled or accepted for enrollment at a school for the
purpose of obtaining a degree, certificate or other  recognized educational credential offered by that
school.
(5) In addition to the duties described in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission  shall advise the Legislative Assembly, the Governor, community
colleges, public universities and other state boards and commissions on policies in order to:
(a) Ensure or improve access to higher education by diverse and underserved populations.
(b) Encourage student success and completion initiatives.
(c) Improve the coordination of the provision of educational services, including:
(A) Transfers and coenrollment throughout the higher education system;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs for high school students;
(C) Applied baccalaureate and other transfer degrees;
(D) Programs and grants that span multiple institutions; and
(E) Reciprocity agreements with other states.
(d) In coordination with the State  Board of Education, enhance the use and quality of dual
credit, career and technical pathways and efforts to create a  culture of college attendance in this
state.
(e) In coordination with the State Workforce  Investment Board, local workforce investment
boards, the Oregon Health and Science University and  independent institutions, ensure that the
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 8
state’s colleges  and universities offer programs in high-demand occupations that meet Oregon’s
workforce needs.
(f) Improve economies of scale by encouraging and facilitating the  use of the shared services
among post-secondary institutions in this state.
(6) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in  a manner consistent with ORS chapter
183, may adopt administrative rules.
(7) With the exception of the rulemaking authority granted in subsection (6) of  this section, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission may  delegate any of its powers, duties or functions to
a committee of the commission or to the executive director of the commission.
(8) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may[ :],
[(a) Establish technical or  advisory committees to assist the commission in exercising its powers,
duties and functions; or ]
[(b)] subject to the Public Contracting Code, enter into  contracts and agreements, including
grant agreements, with public  and private entities for those higher education and workforce devel-
opment activities that are consistent with  ORS 350.001 and 350.005, with the policies set forth in
ORS chapters 341 and 348 and with statutory policies related to career schools  and public univer-
sities.
(9) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  may exercise only powers, duties and func-
tions expressly granted by the Legislative Assembly. Except as otherwise  expressly provided by law,
all other authorities reside  at the institutional level with the respective boards of the post-secondary
institutions.
SECTION 2b. If House Bill 2314 becomes law, section  2 of this 2017 Act (amending ORS
350.075) is repealed and ORS  350.075, as amended by section 61, chapter 774, Oregon Laws
2015, section 6, chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2016, section 56, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016,  and
section 8, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 2314), is amended to read:
350.075. (1) As used in this section, “student access programs” means scholarship,  loan, grant
and access programs described in ORS chapter 348.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be guided by the legislative findings
in ORS 341.009, 350.001 and 350.005 and the  goals and mission of post-secondary education set forth
in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Develop state goals for the state post-secondary education system, including community  col-
leges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and for student access programs.
(b) Determine strategic investments in the state’s community colleges,  public universities and
student access programs necessary to achieve state post-secondary education goals.
(c) Coordinate the post-secondary elements of data collection and structure, with the advice  and
recommendation of the state’s independent  institutions, community colleges and public universities,
as appropriate, in order to construct a state longitudinal data system.
(d) Adopt a strategic plan for achieving state post-secondary education  goals, taking into con-
sideration the contributions of this state’s independent institutions, philanthropic  organizations and
other organizations dedicated to helping Oregonians reach state goals. State post-secondary  educa-
tion goals as described in this section should include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Increasing the educational attainment of the population;
(B) Increasing this state’s global economic competitiveness and the quality of  life of its resi-
dents;
(C) Ensuring  affordable access for qualified Oregon students at each college or public university;
(D) Removing barriers to on-time completion; and
(E) Tracking progress toward meeting the state’s post-secondary  education goals established in
the strategic plan described in this paragraph.
(e)(A) Each biennium, after receiving funding  requests from the state’s community colleges and
public universities as authorized by  law, recommend to the Governor a consolidated higher educa-
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 9
tion agency  request budget aligned with the strategic plan described in paragraph (d) of this sub-
section, including appropriations for:
(i) Student access programs;
(ii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002, including but not limited  to education and general
operations, statewide public services and state-funded debt service;
(iii) Community colleges, including  but not limited to education and general operations and
state-funded debt service;
(iv) New facilities or programs;
(v) Capital improvements and deferred maintenance; [ and]
(vi) Special initiatives and investments ; and
(vii) Any other program, duty or function a public  university listed in ORS 352.002 is
authorized to undertake .
(B) In the development of the consolidated higher education agency request budget:
(i) Determine the costs necessary to provide quality post-secondary education;
(ii) Solicit input from educators, education policy  experts, appropriate legislative committees,
students and other persons interested in the development of the funding model; and
(iii) Solicit public input regarding educational priorities.
(f) Adopt rules governing the distribution of appropriations from the  Legislative Assembly to
community colleges, public universities  listed in ORS 352.002 and student access programs. These
rules must be based on allocation formulas developed in consultation with the state’s  community
colleges and public universities, as appropriate.
(g) Approve or  disapprove any significant change to the academic program of a community col-
lege or a public university listed in ORS 352.002. In reaching a decision under this paragraph,  the
commission shall consider the  recommendation from the community college or public university
seeking to  make the change to an academic program that is issued pursuant to the obligation of the
governing board of a community college or public university to  review and approve academic pro-
grams. The commission shall ensure that approved programs:
(A) Are consistent with the mission statement of the community college or public university;
(B) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic  programs offered by Oregon’s other community
colleges or public universities;
(C) Are not located in a geographic area  that will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other
community colleges or public universities; and
(D) Are allocated among Oregon’s community colleges and  public universities to maximize the
achievement of statewide needs and requirements.
(h) For public universities listed in ORS 352.002:
(A) Approve the mission statement adopted by a governing board of a public university.
(B) Review and determine whether a proposed annual increase  of resident undergraduate en-
rollment fees of greater than five percent is appropriate.
(C) Advise the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on issues of university governance.
(D) Approve and authorize degrees.
(E) Perform the evaluation and certification required by ORS 350.095.
(i) Authorize degrees to be offered by independent  post-secondary institutions in this state under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615.
(j) Oversee the licensing of career schools under ORS 345.010 to 345.450.
(k) Have the  authority to enter into and administer interstate agreements regarding the pro-
vision of post-secondary distance education. The participation by an educational institution  that is
not based in this state in distance learning courses or programs that are part of  an interstate
agreement entered into and administered under this paragraph  does not constitute operating in this
state for  purposes of ORS 348.594 to 348.615. The commission, by rule, may impose a fee on any
educational institution that seeks to operate under or  participate in such interstate agreements. The
fee amount shall be established to recover designated expenses incurred by the  commission in par-
ticipating in such agreements.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 10
(4)(a) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission shall implement a process to resolve
student complaints against any school operating in this state. As part of  the process implemented
under this subsection, the commission may:
(A) Receive student complaints from students regarding a school;
(B) Specify the type of information that must be included in a student complaint;
(C) Investigate any student complaint filed against a school;
(D) Establish a process to review and resolve student complaints against a school, including but
not limited to reviewing school records, holding administrative hearings and issuing final orders;
(E) Assess a fee  to cover the costs of any proceeding brought under this subsection, including
but not limited to the costs of an investigation or administrative hearing;
(F) Require a school to make full or partial restitution to a student or to cease an act or  prac-
tice that is challenged in a student complaint;
(G) Adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection; and
(H) Enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) Any hearing held under this subsection is subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “School” means a school that meets the requirements of ORS 348.597 (2)(a); and
(B) “Student” means a person who is enrolled or accepted for  enrollment at a school for the
purpose of obtaining a degree, certificate or other  recognized educational credential offered by that
school.
(5) In addition to the duties described in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission shall advise the Legislative Assembly, the  Governor, community
colleges, public universities and other state boards and commissions on policies in order to:
(a) Ensure or improve access to higher education by diverse and underserved populations.
(b) Encourage student success and completion initiatives.
(c) Improve the coordination of the provision of educational services, including:
(A) Transfers and coenrollment throughout the higher education system;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs for high school students;
(C) Applied baccalaureate and other transfer degrees;
(D) Programs and grants that span multiple institutions; and
(E) Reciprocity agreements with other states.
(d) In coordination with the State Board of Education, enhance the  use and quality of dual
credit, career and technical pathways and efforts  to create a culture of college attendance in this
state.
(e) In coordination with the State  Workforce Investment Board, local workforce investment
boards, the Oregon Health and Science  University and independent institutions, ensure that the
state’s colleges and universities offer programs in high-demand occupations that meet  Oregon’s
workforce needs.
(f) Improve economies of scale by encouraging and facilitating the  use of the shared services
among post-secondary institutions in this state.
(6) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in  a manner consistent with ORS chapter
183, may adopt administrative rules.
(7) With the exception of the rulemaking authority granted in subsection (6) of  this section, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission may  delegate any of its powers, duties or functions to
a committee of the commission or to the executive director of the commission.
(8) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may[ :],
[(a) Establish technical or  advisory committees to assist the commission in exercising its powers,
duties and functions; or ]
[(b)] subject to the Public Contracting Code, enter into  contracts and agreements, including
grant agreements, with public  and private entities for those higher education and workforce devel-
opment activities that are consistent with  ORS 350.001 and 350.005, with the policies set forth in
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 11
ORS chapters 341 and 348 and with statutory policies related to career schools  and public univer-
sities.
(9) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  may exercise only powers, duties and func-
tions expressly granted by the Legislative Assembly. Except as otherwise  expressly provided by law,
all other authorities reside  at the institutional level with the respective boards of the post-secondary
institutions.
SECTION 3.  ORS 350.095 is amended to read:
350.095. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission is authorized to:
(a) Request, as part of the funding request under ORS 350.090,  appropriations for budgetary
items, including but not limited to education and general operations, statewide public  services, state
funded debt  service, capital improvements, deferred maintenance, special initiatives and investments
or any other purpose listed under ORS 350.075 (3)(e) ; and
(b) Allocate moneys, from  funds appropriated to the commission and other available moneys, to
public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(2) The commission shall certify to the Legislative Assembly, in any funding request pursuant
to subsection (1)(a) of this section for state bonds under  Article XI-F(1) of the Oregon Constitution
for the  benefit of a public university listed in ORS 352.002, its evaluation of the revenue sufficiency,
as defined in ORS  286A.830, of the public university that will receive the proceeds of any Article
XI-F(1) bonds approved by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 350.090, as amended by section  57, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
350.090. [(1)(a) On or before April 1 of each even-numbered  year, each public university listed in
ORS 352.002 must submit to an office designated  by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission
as being responsible for university coordination a funding  request applicable to the biennium beginning
on July 1 of the following year; and ]
[(b) On or before May 1 of each even-numbered year, the office designated under  paragraph (a) of
this subsection shall consolidate the funding requests  from public universities listed in ORS 352.002
and submit the consolidated funding requests to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission. ]
[(2)] (1)  On or before September 1 of each even-numbered year, the  Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission shall submit a  consolidated funding request to the Governor on behalf of all  the
public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
[(3)] (2)  The Governor’s budget may include the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission’s
funding request for public universities listed in ORS 352.002. Any funding request approved by  the
Legislative  Assembly  must specify that the moneys be appropriated to the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission for allocation to the public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may adopt  rules necessary for the
administration of this section.
SECTION 5.  ORS 352.061 is amended to read:
352.061. (1) On an annual basis, the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall submit  to
the Legislative Assembly  an evaluation of [ each university with a governing board. ] public univer-
sities listed in ORS 352.002. Each public university must be evaluated in the  manner required
by this section once every two years. As part of the  evaluation submitted to the Legislative
Assembly,  the commission may make recommendations  [ to the Legislative Assembly ] regarding the
ability of the university to meet academic goals and fulfill its fiduciary responsibilities.
(2) The evaluation must include:
(a) A report on the university’s achievement of outcomes, measures of progress, goals  and tar-
gets;
(b) An assessment of the university’s progress toward achieving the  mission of all education
beyond high school as described in ORS 350.014; and
(c) An assessment as to  how well the establishment of a governing board at the university
comports with the findings set forth in ORS 352.025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 12
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission may adopt rules necessary for the
administration of this section.
SECTION 6.  ORS 350.278 is amended to read:
350.278. (1) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 may not disclose  the Social Security
number of a student who is attending the public university.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the  public university discloses the Social Se-
curity  number:
(a) At the request of  a law enforcement agency or an agency providing support enforcement
services under ORS 25.080;
(b) After obtaining written permission for the  disclosure from the student to whom the number
refers;
(c) In the payment of wages or benefits;
(d) In the payment or collection of taxes or of a debt owed by the student  to whom the number
refers; [ or]
(e) For purposes of statistical analysis[ .]; or
(f) As otherwise required by law.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 352.025 is amended to read:
352.025. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that the State of Oregon will  benefit from having
public universities with governing boards that:
(a) Provide transparency, public accountability and support for the university.
(b) Are close to and closely focused on the individual university.
[(c) Do not negatively impact public universities that do not have governing boards. ]
[(d)] (c)  Lead to greater access  and affordability for Oregon residents and do not disadvantage
Oregon students relative to out-of-state students.
[(e)] (d) Act in the best interests of both the university and the State of Oregon as a whole.
[(f)] (e)  Promote the academic success of students in  support of the mission of all education
beyond high school as described in ORS 350.014.
(2) The Legislative Assembly also finds that:
(a) Even with universities with governing boards, there are  economy-of-scale benefits to having
a coordinated university system.
(b) Even  with universities with governing boards, shared services may continue to be shared
among universities.
(c) Legal title to all real property, whether acquired  before or after the creation of a governing
board, through state funding, revenue bonds  or philanthropy, shall be taken and held in the name
of the State of Oregon, acting by and through the governing board.
(d) The Legislative Assembly has a responsibility to monitor the success  of governing boards
at fulfilling their missions, their compacts and the principles stated in this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 352.027 is amended to read:
352.027. Chapter 768, Oregon Laws 2013, is intended to preserve the autonomy  of the public
universities listed in ORS 352.002 [ whether they are governed by a university governing board or  a
university consortium board ].
SECTION 9.  ORS 352.029 is amended to read:
352.029. As used in ORS 352.025 to 352.146 and 352.388 to 352.415:
(1) “Governing board” means a governing board of a  public university listed in ORS 352.002 that
manages the affairs of  the university by exercising and carrying out all of the powers, rights and
duties that are expressly conferred upon the governing board by law, or that are implied by law  or
are incident to such powers, rights and duties.
(2) “State bonds” means “bonds” as defined in ORS 286A.001 that are issued by  the State
Treasurer.
[(3) “University with a governing  board” means a public university listed in ORS 352.002 that has
established a governing board. ]
SECTION 10.
 ORS 352.076 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 13
352.076. (1) A governing board for a public university must be formed  and maintained as pro-
vided in this section.
(2)(a) Except as provided in  subsection (3) of this section, the Governor shall appoint all of the
11 to 15 members of the governing board, subject to confirmation by the Senate in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(b) The governing board must include one person who is a student enrolled at the  university.
The student shall be a voting member of the board.
(c) The governing board must include one person who is a member of the faculty of the univer-
sity and one person who is a member of the nonfaculty staff of the university.  For each appointment
made under this paragraph, the Governor may appoint the person  as either a voting or nonvoting
member of the governing board.
(3) The president of the university shall be an ex officio nonvoting member of the  governing
board.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the term  of office for each ap-
pointed member of the governing board is four years.
(b) The term of office of each student, faculty  and nonfaculty staff member of the governing
board is two years.
(c) A member of the governing board may not be  appointed to serve more than two consecutive
full terms.
(d) The Governor may remove any appointed member of the governing board  at any time for
cause, after notice and public hearing, but may not remove more than three members within a period
of four years, unless it is for corrupt conduct in office.
(e) Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
(5) The faculty and nonfaculty staff members of the governing board  may not participate in any
discussions or action by the board or attend any executive  session of the board involving collective
bargaining issues that affect faculty or nonfaculty staff at the university.
(6) The governing board  shall select one of its members as chairperson and another as vice
chairperson for such terms and with duties and powers as the board considers necessary for  the
performance of the functions of those offices. The governing board  shall adopt bylaws concerning
how a quorum is constituted and when a quorum is necessary.
(7) The  governing board shall meet at least [ once quarterly ] four times per year , and may meet
at the call of the chairperson or a majority of the voting members of the board.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 352.084 is amended to read:
352.084. Notwithstanding the term  of office specified in ORS 352.076, the [ initial] term of a
member appointed to a governing board by the Governor may be adjusted so  that one-half, as nearly
as possible, of the members of the board are appointed biennially.
SECTION 12.  ORS 352.089, as amended by section 59, chapter  117, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
352.089. (1) A public university listed in  ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] shall adopt a
mission statement for the university, and shall forward the statement to [ an office designated by ] the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission [ as being responsible for university coordination ].
(2) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] shall submit any signif-
icant change in the university’s academic  programs to [ an office designated by ] the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission [ as being responsible  for university coordination ]. The [ office] commission
shall establish a process for reviewing the significant program change [ and submitting it  to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] for approval. The  commission shall establish, by rule,
what constitutes a significant change to  a university’s academic program. The commission shall
further ensure that approved programs:
(a) Are consistent with the mission statement of the university;
(b) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic programs offered by Oregon’s other  public univer-
sities;
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 14
(c) Are not located in a  geographic area that will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other public
universities; and
(d) Are allocated among Oregon’s public universities  to maximize the achievement of statewide
needs and requirements.
[(3)(a) On or before April 1 of each even-numbered year, each university listed in  ORS 352.002
must submit to an office designated by the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission as being re-
sponsible for university coordination a funding request  applicable to the biennium beginning on July
1 of the following year. On or before May 1 of each even-numbered year,  the office shall consolidate
the funding requests from public universities listed in ORS  350.090 and submit the consolidated fund-
ing requests to the commission. ]
[(b)] (3)(a)  Pursuant  to ORS 350.090, on or before September 1 of each even-numbered year,
the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall submit a consolidated funding request to the
Governor on behalf of all public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
[(c)] (b) The Governor’s budget may include funding requests from public universities[ , including
universities with governing boards ].
(4) As part of a funding request submitted under subsection (3) of this section,  a public univer-
sity listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] may request, and appropriations may include
but are not limited to , funding for education  and general operations, statewide public services,
state-funded debt service, capital improvements, deferred maintenance, special initiatives  and in-
vestments or any other purpose authorized  by ORS 350.075 (3)(e) . Any moneys appropriated to
pay debt service for state bonds must be held by the State Treasurer pursuant to an agreement en-
tered into by  the State Treasurer and a public university [ with a governing board ] under ORS
352.135 (2).
(5) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 that wishes  to request the issuance of state bonds,
including a public university [ with a governing board ] that elects to  remain eligible to receive pro-
ceeds of state bonds under ORS 352.402, must make a  request to this effect to [ an office designated
by] the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission [ as being responsible for university
coordination]. The [ office] commission  shall establish a process for reviewing  the request to issue
state bonds [ and submit the request to the commission ]. The  commission shall decide whether, and in
what manner, to make a request for the issuance of state bonds to the Legislative Assembly.
(6)(a) Each public university listed in ORS  352.002[ , including universities with governing
boards,] shall respond to a request for data from the Legislative Assembly or  other state body by
submitting the requested information to [ an office designated by ] the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission [ as being responsible for university coordination ]. The [ office] commission  shall consol-
idate the data  received from public universities [ and provide the data to the commission ]. The com-
mission shall be responsible for providing the data to the  Legislative Assembly or other requesting
entity.
(b) As used in this subsection, “data” means any information that, as of  August 14, 2013, is
collected by [ an office designated by ] the Higher Education Coordinating Commission [ as being  re-
sponsible for university coordination ] from each university and reported to the Legislative Assembly
or any other state entity, including but not limited  to retention and graduation rates and demo-
graphic information on students.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 352.129 is amended to read:
352.129. (1) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002 shall, by agreement, establish  a sys-
tem of  shared administrative services for the: [Notwithstanding ORS 352.087 and 352.102 and
section 169, chapter 768,  Oregon Laws 2013, the amendments to ORS 243.107 and 351.094 (renumbered
352.237) by sections 88 and 113, chapter 768, Oregon Laws 2013, and the operative date set forth in
section 171, chapter 768, Oregon Laws 2013, until July 1, 2019, each university with  a governing board
shall continue to participate with other public universities  listed in ORS 352.002 in all shared admin-
istrative services relating to: ]
[(a) The following employee benefits: ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 15
(a) Maintenance of  federal tax benefits relating to state bonds issued for the benefit of
each public university prior to April 30, 2015;
(b) Performance of administrative services relating to the following employee benefits:
(A) Group insurance or deferred compensation plans authorized by ORS 352.237;
(B) The Public Employees Retirement System or another plan  authorized under ORS chapter 238
or 238A;
(C) The Optional Retirement Plan authorized by ORS 243.800; and
(D) A public university tax-deferred investment plan that obtains  the advantages of 26 U.S.C.
403(b) and is authorized by ORS 243.820; and
[(b)] (c)  Collective bargaining with  any statewide bargaining unit that includes employees of two
or more public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(2)(a) A public university listed in  ORS 352.002 may opt out of the shared administrative
service listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section only  if the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services has adopted rules under ORS 286A.863 relating to standards, terms and
conditions for maintaining federal tax benefits  that apply to public universities listed in ORS
352.002 that opt out of  shared administrative services described in subsection (1)(a) of this
section.
(b) Prior to July 1, 2019, a public university listed in ORS 352.002 must provide  the same
scope and overall value of each employee benefit listed in subsection (1)(b) of this  section as
is required by the statutes referenced in subsection (1)(b) of  this section. [During the period
a public university listed in ORS  352.002 is required to participate in shared administrative services
under subsection (1) of this section, the  public university must provide the same scope and overall value
of each employee benefit listed in subsection (1)(a)  of this section as is required by the statutes refer-
enced in subsection (1)(a) of this section. ]
[(3) The shared administrative services  listed in subsection (1) of this section must be done under
the same terms, conditions, funding model and policy frameworks as those that exist on  August 14,
2013, until July 1, 2015. On and  after July 1, 2015, public universities listed in ORS 352.002 may
choose to participate in shared services under an alternative shared services model. ]
[(4)(a)] (3)(a)  Two or more public universities listed in ORS 352.002  may participate in shared
services not described in subsection (1) of this section, including but  not limited to shared services
involving legal services and information technology.
(b) If a public university listed in ORS 352.002, or a community college,  negotiates a contract
with one or more third party financial firms, as defined in ORS  348.015, to provide disbursement and
management services of financial aid funds, or management of financial  accounts, to enrolled stu-
dents, the public university or community college shall undertake reasonable efforts  to establish
collaboration agreements with other public universities or community colleges to negotiate the  ser-
vices.
[(5)(a) A university with a governing board shall participate  in shared services providing for
maintenance of federal tax benefits relating to state bonds issued for the benefit  of the university prior
to April 30, 2015, unless the university opts out of shared  services as described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection.]
[(b) A university with  a governing board may opt out of the shared services described in paragraph
(a) of  this subsection only if the Oregon Department of Administrative Services has adopted rules under
ORS 286A.863 relating to standards, terms and conditions for maintaining federal  tax benefits that
apply to universities  with governing boards that opt out of shared services described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection. ]
[(c)] (4)  As used in this [ subsection] section , “federal tax benefits” has the meaning given  that
term in ORS 286A.830.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 291.035 is amended to read:
291.035. (1) As used in this section:
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 16
(a)(A) “Information technology initiative” means  a project to develop or provide, with a state
contracting agency’s or  public corporation’s own personnel and resources, or to obtain by means
of a procurement or set of related procurements:
(i) New hardware, software or services for data processing, office automation  or telecommuni-
cations;
(ii) An overhaul, upgrade or replacement  of a substantial portion of the hardware or software
in an existing data processing, office automation or telecommunications system; or
(iii) A substantial expansion of  existing data processing, office automation or telecommuni-
cations services.
(B) “Information technology initiative” does not include:
(i) A procurement for preliminary quality assurance services or quality management services;
(ii) A routine update to or purchase of hardware or software within an existing data  processing,
office automation or telecommunications system;
(iii) A renewal of an existing  contract for data processing, office automation or telecommuni-
cations services under terms and conditions that are substantially the same  as in the existing con-
tract; or
(iv) A replacement  of a component of an existing data processing, office automation or tele-
communications system that is not essential for the  system to function as designed or that occurs
at the end of the component’s anticipated life cycle.
(b) “Preliminary quality assurance services” means a set of services in which a  contractor pro-
vides an  independent and objective review of a state contracting agency’s or a public corporation’s
plans, specifications, estimates, documentation, available resources and overall purpose for an  in-
formation technology initiative,  including services in which the contractor evaluates a proposed in-
formation technology initiative against applicable quality standards and best practices from  private
industry and other sources.
(c) “Procurement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(d)(A) “Public corporation” means a corporation:
(i) The operations of which are subject to control by this state  or by an agency or
instrumentality of this state, or by officers of this state or of an  agency or instrumentality of this
state;
(ii) That is organized, at least in part, to serve a public purpose; and
(iii) That receives public funds or other support from an entity described in sub-subparagraph
(i) of this subparagraph.
(B) “Public corporation” does not include:
(i) A person or entity described in ORS 174.108 (3);
(ii) A city, county, local service district, school district, education service district, community
college district or community college service district or a public university listed in ORS 352.002
[with a governing board listed in ORS 352.054 ]; or
(iii) An administrative subdivision of an entity described in sub-subparagraph  (ii) of this sub-
paragraph.
(e) “Quality  management services” means a set of services in which a contractor provides an
independent and objective review and evaluation of a state contracting agency’s,  a public
corporation’s or another contractor’s performance with respect to an information  technology initi-
ative, such as services in which the contractor:
(A) Identifies quality standards that apply  or should apply to the information technology initi-
ative;
(B) Suggests methods and means by  which the state contracting agency, the public corporation
or the other contractor may meet quality standards  identified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) Reviews and evaluates the state contracting agency’s,  the public corporation’s or the other
contractor’s performance regularly as the information technology initiative  progresses from start to
finish;
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 17
(D) Identifies omissions or gaps in the  state contracting agency’s, the public corporation’s or the
other contractor’s planning,  execution, control, methodology, communication or reporting as the in-
formation technology initiative progresses from start to finish;
(E) Identifies risks in  the state contracting agency’s, the public corporation’s or the other
contractor’s plans or approach to designing, developing  or implementing the information technology
initiative and suggests methods to reduce, mitigate or eliminate the risks;
(F) Assists the state contracting agency  or the public corporation in testing or otherwise eval-
uating the hardware, software or services that are developed, provided  or obtained as part of an
information technology initiative to determine  whether the hardware, software or services conform
with the quality standards identified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(G) Advises  the State Chief Information Officer, the state contracting agency or the public cor-
poration as to whether the hardware, software or services that are developed,  provided or obtained
as part  of an information technology initiative meet the contracting agency’s or the public
corporation’s needs, specifications or expectations and otherwise enable the  state contracting
agency or the public corporation to  achieve the objectives for the information technology initiative;
or
(H) Identifies unsatisfactory performance  and suggests methods the State Chief Information Of-
ficer, the state contracting agency, the  public corporation or the other contractor might use to
eliminate the causes of unsatisfactory performance.
(f) “State contracting agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(2)(a) A state contracting agency or a public corporation that implements an information  tech-
nology initiative shall obtain quality management  services from a qualified contractor if the value
of the information technology initiative exceeds $5  million or if the information technology initiative
meets criteria or standards that the State Chief Information Officer specifies by rule or policy.
(b) A state contracting agency or public corporation may, subject to ORS 279B.040,  procure
preliminary quality assurance  services from a contractor if the information technology initiative
meets the standards set forth in paragraph (a) of this  subsection or if the state contracting agency
or public corporation otherwise believes that the preliminary  quality assurance services will enable
the contracting agency or public corporation to implement an  information technology initiative
successfully.
(3) A state contracting agency or  public corporation may not artificially divide or fragment an
information technology initiative so as to avoid the application of this section.
(4) Notwithstanding any procurement authority that  a state contracting agency or a public
corporation has that is not subject to the authority of the Director  of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services or  the State Chief Information Officer under ORS 279A.050 (2) or (7), the
state contracting agency or public  corporation is subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section and shall consult with and follow the rules, policies and procedures of the  State Chief In-
formation Officer in determining the  extent of preliminary quality assurance services or quality
management services that the state contracting agency  or public corporation will require for an
information technology initiative.
(5)(a) If a state contracting agency or a public corporation awards a contract  for preliminary
quality assurance services or quality management  services, the contract must provide that at the
same time a contractor provides a  preliminary or final report to the contract administrator, the
contractor shall also provide a copy of the report to:
(A) The State Chief Information Officer;
(B) The Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(C) The Legislative Fiscal Officer; and
(D) As appropriate for the specific information technology initiative, to:
(i) The director of the state contracting agency or, if a board or commission sets policy for the
state contracting agency, to the board or commission; or
(ii) The governing body of the public corporation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 18
(b) The state contracting agency or public  corporation shall provide the contractor with names,
addresses and other contact information the contractor needs to comply with paragraph (a)  of this
subsection.
(6) This section does not apply to the Secretary of State or the State Treasurer.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 352.033 is amended to read:
352.033. A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] is a  governmental
entity performing governmental functions and  exercising governmental powers. A public university
listed in  ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] is not considered a unit of local or municipal gov-
ernment or a  state agency, board, commission or institution for purposes of state statutes or con-
stitutional provisions.
SECTION 16.  ORS 352.039 is amended to read:
352.039. (1) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing  board ] is created to
carry out public missions and services in keeping with principles  of public accountability and fun-
damental public policy, guided by the legislative findings  in ORS 350.001 and 350.005 and consistent
with the goals and mission described in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(2) A public university  listed in ORS 352.002  [with a governing board ] is an independent public
body with statewide  purposes and missions and without territorial boundaries. A public university
[with a governing board ] shall exercise and carry out all of the powers, rights and privileges, within
and outside this state, that are expressly conferred upon the public university  [ with a governing
board], or that are implied by law or are incident to such powers, rights and duties.
SECTION 17.  ORS 352.087 is amended to read:
352.087. (1) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] may:
(a) Acquire,  receive, hold, keep, pledge, control, convey, manage, use, lend, expend and invest
all moneys, appropriations, gifts, bequests, stock and revenue from any source.
(b) Borrow money for  the needs of the university in such amounts and for such time and upon
such terms as may be determined by the university or the governing board.
(c) Make any and all contracts and agreements,  enter into any partnership, joint venture or
other business arrangement and create and participate fully in the operation of  any business struc-
ture, including but not limited to the  development of business structures and networks with any
public or private government, nonprofit or for-profit person or entity, that in the judgment  of the
university or the governing board is necessary or appropriate.
(d) Establish, collect and use charges, fines  and fees for services, facilities, operations and pro-
grams.
(e) Purchase, receive, subscribe for or otherwise acquire, own,  hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage,
lend, pledge, invest in or otherwise dispose of and deal in or with the shares, stock or other  equity
or interests in or  obligations of any other entity. The State of Oregon may not have any proprietary
or other interest in investments or funds referenced in this paragraph.
(f) Acquire, purchase, purchase on a contractual basis, borrow, receive, own,  hold, control,
convey, sell, manage, operate, lease, lease-purchase, license, lend, invest in, issue, improve,  develop,
use, expend and dispose of personal property, including intellectual property, of  any nature, tangible
or intangible.
(g) Establish employee benefit plans of any type, subject to ORS 352.237.
(h) Take, hold, grant, pledge or dispose of mortgages, liens and  other security interests on real
and personal property.
(i) Spend all available moneys without appropriation or  expenditure limitation approval from the
Legislative Assembly, except for moneys  received by a public university [ with a governing board ]
pursuant to a funding request submitted under ORS 352.089 (3) and the proceeds of state bonds is-
sued for the benefit of a public university [ with a governing board ]. The proceeds of state bonds is-
sued for the benefit of a public university [ with a governing board ] must be held  pursuant to an
agreement entered into by the  State Treasurer and a public university [ with a governing board ]
under ORS 352.135 (2).
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 19
(j) Acquire, purchase, purchase on a contractual basis, borrow, receive, own,  hold, control,
convey, mortgage, pledge or otherwise encumber,  sell, manage, operate, lease, lease-purchase, li-
cense, lend, invest in, improve, develop, use, expend and dispose of real property.
(k) Erect, construct, improve, remodel, develop, repair, maintain, equip,  furnish, lease, lend,
convey, sell, manage, operate, use and dispose of any building, structure, land or project.
(L) Acquire,  by condemnation or otherwise, private property that is necessary or convenient.
The right to acquire property by condemnation shall be exercised as provided by ORS chapter 35.
(m) Establish policies for the  organization, administration and development of the university
which, to the extent set forth in those  policies, shall have the force of law and may be enforced
through university procedures that include  an opportunity for appeal and in any court of competent
jurisdiction.
(n) Sue in its own name,  be sued in its own name and issue and enforce subpoenas in its own
name.
(o) Hire or retain attorneys for the provision of all legal  services. A public university [ with a
governing board ] shall reimburse the  State Treasurer for legal fees incurred in connection with state
bonds issued at the request of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  on behalf of the
university.
(p) Purchase any and all insurance, operate a self-insurance  program or otherwise arrange for
the equivalent of insurance coverage of any nature  and the indemnity and defense of its officers,
agents and employees or other persons designated by the university.
(q) Subject to the procedures set forth in ORS  352.089, establish, supervise and control academic
and other programs, units of operation and standards, qualifications, policies and  practices relating
to university  matters such as admissions, curriculum, grading, student conduct, credits, scholarships
and the granting of academic degrees, certificates and other forms of recognition.
(r) Enforce and recover any fees, charges and fines,  including but not limited to tuition and
mandatory enrollment fees.
(s) Make available and perform any  and all services on such terms as the governing board
considers appropriate.
(t) Delegate and provide  for the further delegation of any and all powers and duties, subject to
the limitations expressly set forth in law.
(2) The budget for  a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] shall be
prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and adopted by the  governing
board in accordance with ORS 192.610 to 192.690.
(3) A governing board  of a public university  listed in ORS 352.002 or a public university [ with
a governing board ] may perform any other acts that in the judgment of the governing board or
university are required, necessary or appropriate to accomplish  the rights and responsibilities
granted to the governing board or university by law.
SECTION 18.  ORS 352.096 is amended to read:
352.096. (1)(a) In consultation with the Governor, or the  Governor’s designee, the governing
board of a public university  listed in ORS 352.002  shall appoint and employ a president of the
university.
(b) The governing board shall prescribe the president’s compensation and  terms and conditions
of employment.
(2) The president of [ the] a public university listed in ORS 352.002  is the president of the fac-
ulty. The president is also the executive and governing officer of the university,  except as otherwise
provided by statute or  action of the governing board. Subject to the supervision of the governing
board, the president of the university has authority to direct the affairs of the university.
(3) Except in the case of an interim or acting president, the  hiring committee for the president
of a public university listed in ORS  352.002 [ with a governing board ] shall include representatives
of the university community and at least one other president of a public university  based in Oregon.
(4) The governing  board  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002  is responsible for the
reappointment or removal of the president of the university.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 20
(5) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] may appoint and employ
any instructional, administrative, professional, trade, occupational and  other personnel as are nec-
essary or appropriate and establish their  compensation and terms and conditions of employment,
subject to the limitations set forth in ORS 352.124 (1) and (2).
SECTION 19.  ORS 352.113 is amended to read:
352.113. (1) Legal  title to all real property acquired by a  public university listed in ORS 352.002
[with a governing board ] must be taken and held in the name of the State of Oregon, acting by and
through the governing board  of the public  university. Legal title to all real property conveyed to
a public university [ with a governing board ] is considered to be conveyed to and vested in the State
of Oregon, acting by and through the governing board. Authorized  conveyances of all real property,
other than  university lands, acquired by or vested in the State of Oregon for the use or benefit of
the university must be executed in the name of the State  of Oregon, acting by and through the
governing board, by the chairperson of the governing board.
(2) The governing board has custody and  control of and shall care for all real property used for
university purposes. Management, maintenance, encumbrance, disposal and preservation of all real
property used for university purposes, whether the real property is acquired  before or after the es-
tablishment of a governing board, is the responsibility  of the governing board. Unless the governing
board has granted prior consent, real property taken and held under this  section may only be en-
cumbered by the State of Oregon in accordance with state law and in a manner that would not im-
pair the financial condition of the university or the rights of the holders  of any obligations of the
university issued or incurred under any master indenture or other financing agreement.
(3) Legal title to all personal property  acquired, constructed, remodeled, repaired, equipped or
furnished with the proceeds  of bonds issued pursuant to Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 [with a governing board ] must be taken and
held in the name of the State  of Oregon, acting by and through the governing board. The governing
board has custody and control of the personal property and shall care for  the personal property
owned by the State of Oregon. When  the Article XI-Q bonds are no longer outstanding, legal title
to the personal property automatically by operation of law transfers to and  vests in the public
university [ with a governing board ] for whose benefit the Article XI-Q bonds were issued.
(4) Unless the State Treasurer has  granted prior consent, real or personal property held in the
name of the State of Oregon, or in which the State of Oregon has an ownership or  other legal in-
terest, that was acquired, constructed, improved  with or otherwise directly benefited by the pro-
ceeds of outstanding state bonds, may not be:
(a) Used by a governing board in a manner that would give rise to private business use; or
(b) Sold, transferred, encumbered, leased or otherwise disposed of by a governing  board. The
reference to leases in this paragraph does not apply to residential leases  that a governing board
enters into with students, faculty or employees of the university.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 352.118 is amended to read:
352.118. (1) A governing board may, in its sole discretion, do all of the following:
(a) Police, control and regulate traffic and parking of vehicles on university property.
(b) Establish  a police department and commission one or more employees as police officers in
the manner and with all of the privileges and immunities set forth in ORS 352.121. When a governing
board establishes a police department and commissions  one or more employees as police officers, the
president of  the university, in cooperation with the chief of the police department, shall establish
a process by which the university will receive and respond  to complaints involving the policies of
the police department and the conduct of the police officers.
(c) Commission special campus security  officers who, when acting in the scope of their employ-
ment, shall have stop and frisk authority as set forth in ORS 131.605 to 131.625 and  probable cause
arrest authority and the accompanying immunities as set forth  in ORS 133.310 and 133.315. Special
campus security officers may not be authorized to carry firearms as  police officers and, except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, may not  be considered police officers for purposes of ORS
181A.355, 238.005, 243.005 or 243.736.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 21
(2) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ], acting by and  through
its special campus security officers, is a criminal justice agency for purposes of rules adopted  pur-
suant to ORS 181A.280 (3).
SECTION 21.  ORS 352.124 is amended to read:
352.124. (1) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] shall engage in
collective bargaining with local bargaining organizations of the employees of the university.
(2) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] shall participate in a
collective  bargaining  partnership with other public universities in this state for the purpose of en-
gaging in collective bargaining  with existing statewide bargaining organizations of the employees
of the public university. The  collective bargaining partnership shall be established by written
agreement.
(3) Subject to the authority of the Secretary of State to audit  public accounts, a public univer-
sity listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] may  conduct an independent audit if the gov-
erning board of the public university  considers the audit advisable. Subject  to ORS 297.250, the
independent audit is subject  to the exclusive discretion and control of the university. The inde-
pendent audit is subject to disclosure pursuant to ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
SECTION 22.  ORS 352.135 is amended to read:
352.135. (1) All moneys collected or  received by a public university listed in ORS 352.002 [with
a governing board ], placed to the credit of the governing  board of the public university  and re-
maining unexpended and unobligated on July 1,  2014, or the date that the board is established,
whichever is later, and all moneys collected or received by  a public university [ with a governing
board] after that date, may be:
(a) Deposited into one or more accounts established by  the board in depositories insured by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund,  and the
governing board shall ensure that sufficient collateral  secures any amount of funds on deposit that
exceeds  the  limits of the coverage of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National
Credit Union Share Insurance Fund; or
(b) Held, kept, pledged, controlled,  conveyed, managed, used, loaned, expended and invested as
set forth in ORS 352.087 and 352.102.
(2) Upon a request by the State Treasurer, a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a
governing board ] shall enter into a written agreement  with the state that provides for the State
Treasurer to receive, hold, keep, manage and invest any amounts  under the control of the university
that the State Treasurer determines should be held by the State Treasurer to provide for payment
of state bonds and other state obligations that are to be paid from  appropriations described in ORS
352.089 (4), revenues of the university or other moneys under the control of the  university. The
agreement may, at the request of the State Treasurer, require  the university to pay the costs in-
curred by the State Treasurer in connection with entering into and carrying out the agreement.
(3) Upon a request  by a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ], the
State Treasurer  may receive, hold, keep, manage and invest any or all moneys, appropriations, gifts,
bequests or revenues of the university from any source in accordance with an  agreement entered
into between the State  Treasurer and the university and with the policies and procedures estab-
lished by the State Treasurer, including the recoupment of  costs incurred by the State Treasurer in
carrying out these tasks.
(4) As used in this section, “depository” has the meaning given that term in ORS 295.001.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 352.138, as amended by section 8, chapter 31, Oregon Laws  2016, is amended
to read:
352.138. (1) The following entities are not  subject to any provision of law enacted after January
1, 2013, that is unique to governmental entities unless the following entities are expressly named:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ]; and
(b) Any not-for-profit organization or other entity if the equity of the  entity is owned or con-
trolled  exclusively  by a  public university [ with a governing board ] and if the organization or entity
is created by the university to advance any of the university’s statutory missions.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 22
(2) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section and ORS 352.033, the provisions of ORS 30.260
to 30.460, 33.710, 33.720, 200.005 to 200.025, 200.045  to 200.090, 236.605 to 236.640, 279.835, 279.840,
279.850 and 297.040  and ORS chapters 35, 190, 192 and 244 apply to a public university listed in
ORS 352.002 [ with a governing board ] under the same terms as they apply  to public bodies other
than the state.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of ORS 35.550 to 35.575, 180.060,  180.210
to 180.235, 184.305 to 184.345, 190.480, 190.490,  200.035, 243.696, 357.805 to 357.895 and 656.017 (2)
and ORS chapters 182, 183, 240, 270, 273, 276, 278, 279A, 279B, 279C, 282, 283, 291, 292, 293, 294,  295
and 297 do not apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ].
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this  section and ORS 352.033, ORS 240.167,
279C.600 to 279C.625, 279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.825, 279C.827, 279C.830, 279C.835, 279C.836, 279C.838,
279C.840, 279C.845, 279C.850, 279C.855, 279C.860, 279C.865, 279C.870 and 292.043  apply to a public
university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] under the same terms as they apply to
public bodies other than the state.
(b) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section, ORS 279C.800 to  279C.870 apply to
an agreement under the  terms of which a private entity constructs, reconstructs, renovates or paints
an improvement  on real property owned by a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a gov-
erning board ] or by a not-for-profit organization or other entity that a public university [ with a
governing board ] owns or controls exclusively.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, ORS  190.430 and 192.105 do not apply to a
public university listed in ORS 352.002 [with a governing board ] or any organization or other entity
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, except  as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, ORS
243.650 to 243.782 and 276.073 to 276.090 and ORS chapters 238 and 238A apply to a public univer-
sity listed in ORS 352.002 [with a governing board ] under  the same terms as they apply to the state.
(7) ORS 350.285, 350.290, 352.198, 352.226, 352.232, 352.293,  352.296, 352.303, 352.309 and 352.313
apply to a public university  listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ].
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing
board] and its agents and employees remain subject to all statutes and administrative  rules of this
state that create rights, benefits or protections in favor of military veterans,  service members and
families of service  members to the same extent as an agency of this state would be subject to such
statutes and administrative rules.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550 apply to a public university
listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ]. A public university [ with a governing board ] may
not issue a tax credit certificate under ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550 that will  cause the General
Fund to be owed more than $8.4 million at any one time under ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550.
(10) If state bonds  are issued for the benefit of a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with
a governing board ] under Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution:
(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall have the powers  and duties of a
project agency, as defined  in ORS 286A.816, to the extent necessary for the issuance of the state
bonds and the administration of the proceeds of the state bonds; and
(b) The university and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  enter into grant
contracts or loan agreements that comply with rules  adopted by the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services relating to:
(A) Disbursement of  project funds by a project agency through grant contracts or loan agree-
ments;
(B) Submission of a request for project funds to the commission under ORS 350.095; and
(C) Any other matters determined by  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services to be
necessary for the administration of the Article XI-Q bond program.
(11) Nothing in  this section may be construed so that statutory provisions that are not set forth
in this section apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ].
SECTION 24.
 ORS 352.141 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 23
352.141. A public university listed in ORS 352.002 [with a governing board ] may open, establish,
lay out and dedicate  to the public use any streets through lands owned by or used for the university.
When such streets are opened, established and laid out, they  are declared to be dedicated to the
public use. The university may declare that it is the road authority pursuant  to ORS 810.010 (4) for
any or all roads through lands owned by or used for the university.
SECTION 25.  ORS 352.146 is amended to read:
352.146. The president and professors constitute the faculty and as  such have the immediate
government and discipline of a  public university listed in ORS 352.002 [with a governing board ] and
the students  therein, except as otherwise provided by law or action of the governing board  of the
public university . The faculty may, subject to the supervision of the governing board and ORS
352.089, prescribe the course of study to be pursued in the university and the textbooks  to be used.
SECTION 26.  ORS 352.226 is amended to read:
352.226. (1) A governing board as defined  in ORS 352.029 may, for the public university under
its control, adopt standards and specific orders  by or through the president of each public university
governing access to personnel records of the public  university or office, department or activity that
are less than 25 years old.
(2) Standards adopted under subsection (1) of this section  shall require that personnel records
be subjected to restrictions on access unless upon a finding by the president  of the public university
that the public interest in maintaining  individual rights to privacy in an adequate educational en-
vironment would not suffer by disclosure of such records. Access to such records  may be limited to
designated classes of information or persons, or to stated times and conditions, or to both, but can-
not be limited for records more than 25 years old.
(3) A standard or order promulgated  pursuant to this section may not deny to a faculty member
full access to the member’s personnel file or records kept by the public university,  except as pro-
vided in subsections (7) and (8) of this section.
(4) The number of files relating to the evaluation of a faculty member is limited to three,  to be
kept in designated, available locations.
(5) Any evaluation received  by telephone must be documented in each of the faculty member’s
files by means of a written  summary of the conversation with the names of the conversants identi-
fied.
(6) A faculty member is entitled to submit, for placement  in the three files, evidence rebutting,
correcting, amplifying or explaining any document contained  therein and other material that the
member believes might be of assistance in the evaluation process.
(7) Letters and other information submitted in confidence to the State Board of Higher Educa-
tion or its public universities, offices, departments or activities prior to July 1, 1975, shall be
maintained in the files designated by the governing board of the  public university currently em-
ploying the faculty member. However, if a faculty member requests access to those files, the ano-
nymity of the contributor of letters and other information obtained prior to July 1, 1975, shall  be
protected. The full text shall be made available except that  portions of the text that would serve to
identify the contributor shall be excised by a faculty committee. Only the names of the contributors
and the excised portions of the documents may be kept in a file other than the three prescribed  by
subsection (4) of this section.
(8)(a) Confidential letters and other information submitted to or solicited after July 1,  1975, by
the State Board of Higher Education or its public universities, offices, departments or activities
prior to the employment of a  prospective faculty member are exempt from the provisions of this
section. However, if the member is currently  employed by a public university or its offices, depart-
ments or activities, the confidential preemployment materials shall be  placed in the three authorized
files. If a faculty member requests access to  the member’s files, the anonymity of the contributor
of confidential preemployment letters and other preemployment  information shall be protected. The
full text shall be made available, except that portions of the text  that would serve to identify the
contributor shall be excised and retained in a file other than the three designated in subsection  (4)
of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 24
(b) Confidential letters and other information submitted to or solicited by a  public university
listed in ORS 352.002 after the date that the university [ became a university with ] obtained a gov-
erning board, and prior to the employment of a prospective faculty member are exempt from  the
provisions of this section. However, if the member is employed by the  university, the confidential
preemployment materials shall be  placed in the three authorized files. If a faculty member requests
access to the member’s files, the  anonymity of the contributor of confidential preemployment letters
and other preemployment information shall be protected. The full text shall be made  available, ex-
cept that portions  of the text that would serve to identify the contributor shall be excised and re-
tained in a file other than the three designated in subsection (4) of this section.
(9) Classroom survey evaluation by students of a faculty member’s classroom or laboratory per-
formance shall be anonymous. The record of tabulated reports shall be placed in at least one  of the
files designated  in subsection (4) of this section. All survey instruments used to obtain evaluation
data shall be returned to the faculty member.
(10) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 and, after July 1, 1975,  but before the date on
which the public university  obtained [ became a university with ] a governing board, the State  Board
of Higher Education and its public universities, offices, departments  or activities, when evaluating
its employed  faculty members, may not solicit or accept letters, documents or other materials, given
orally or in written  form, from individuals or groups who wish their identity kept anonymous or the
information they provide kept confidential.
(11) A standard or  order promulgated pursuant to this section does not limit the authority of a
public university to prepare, without identification of individual persons who have  not consented
thereto, statistical or demographic reports from personnel records.
(12) Any category of personnel  records specifically designated as confidential pursuant to valid
standards or orders pursuant to this section is not a public record  for the purposes of ORS 192.420.
(13) As used in this section, “personnel records”  means records containing information kept by
the public university, office, department or  activity concerning a faculty member and furnished by
the faculty member or by others about the faculty member at the request of  the faculty member or
the public university, office, department or activity, including, but  not limited to, information con-
cerning discipline, membership activity,  employment performance or other personal records of indi-
vidual persons.
SECTION 27.  ORS 352.388 is amended to read:
352.388. As used in ORS 352.388 to 352.415:
(1) “Bond-related costs” means:
(a) The costs of paying the principal of, the interest on and the  premium, if any, on revenue
bonds.
(b) The costs and expenses of issuing, administering and maintaining revenue bonds, including,
but not limited to, the costs and expenses of:
(A) Redeeming revenue bonds.
(B) Paying amounts  due in connection with credit enhancement devices or agreements for ex-
change of interest rates.
(C) Paying the fees, administrative costs and expenses of a  public university listed in  ORS
352.002 [ with a governing board ] related to revenue bonds, including, but not limited to,  the costs
of consultants, bond  trustees, remarketing agents, escrow agents, arbitrage rebate consultants, cal-
culation agents and advisers retained by the university.
(c) The costs of funding reserves for the revenue bonds.
(d) Capitalized interest for the revenue bonds.
(e) Rebates or penalties due to the United States in connection with the revenue bonds.
(f) Any other costs or expenses that a public university [ with a governing board ] determines are
necessary or desirable in connection with issuing and maintaining the revenue bonds.
(2) “Credit enhancement device” means an agreement or contractual  relationship between a
public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] and a bank, trust company, insur-
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 25
ance company,  surety bonding company, pension fund or other financial institution or entity pro-
viding additional credit on or security for a revenue bond.
(3) “For the benefit  of a public university [ with a governing board ]” means, in relation to state
bonds:
(a) Before August 14, 2013, the portion of the proceeds of the state  bonds that was used to fi-
nance property, projects or liabilities on behalf of the State Board of Higher Education and for the
benefit of a public university  listed  in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] in pursuing the pur-
poses and missions of the university.
(b) On or after August 14, 2013, the portion of the proceeds of the state bonds a public univer-
sity listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] is eligible to receive under ORS 352.402 to fi-
nance property, projects or liabilities  on behalf of and for the benefit of a public university [ with
a governing board ] in pursuing the purposes and missions of the university.
(4) “Obligation” means:
(a) A revenue bond;
(b) The commitment of a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] in
connection with a credit enhancement device; or
(c) An agreement for exchange of interest rates.
(5) “Operative document”  means a bond declaration, trust agreement, indenture, security
agreement or other document in which a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [with a governing
board] makes a pledge.
(6) “Pledge” means:
(a) To create a lien on revenue or property.
(b) A lien created on revenue or property.
(7) “Revenue”  means tuition, fees, charges, rents, revenues, interest, dividends, receipts and
other income of a  public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ], except moneys
received by the university from taxes collected by the State of Oregon.
(8) “Revenue bond”:
(a) Means a contractual undertaking or instrument of a public university listed in ORS 352.002
[with a governing board ] to repay borrowed moneys, which undertaking or instrument  is secured by
a pledge of all or part of the revenue of the university.
(b) Does not mean a credit enhancement device or a state bond.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 352.402 is amended to read:
352.402. (1) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] may elect  to
remain eligible  to receive proceeds of state bonds. If a public university [ with a governing board ]
requests the State Treasurer to issue state bonds for the benefit of the  university [ with a governing
board] that are authorized under Article XI-F(1) or XI-Q of the  Oregon Constitution or ORS 283.085
to 283.092, and the state bonds  are intended to be repaid in whole or in part by university revenues
or other moneys under the control of the university, the State Treasurer  must review and approve
all plans to issue revenue bonds of the university and to execute other obligations  related to the
revenue bonds.
(2) The  State Treasurer shall limit the scope of review and approval under subsection (1) of this
section to consideration of periodic cash flow projections and other information necessary to deter-
mine the sufficiency of the cash flow of  the public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a gov-
erning board ] to pay any loans from  state agencies funded with the proceeds of state bonds and to
pay costs for:
(a) State bonds  issued for the benefit of the public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a
governing board ] pursuant to Article  XI-F(1) or XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution or ORS 283.085 to
283.092; and
(b) Revenue bonds issued pursuant to ORS 352.388 to 352.415.
(3) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 [with a governing board ] that issues revenue bonds
of the university, or executes other obligations related to the revenue bonds, without  the approval
of the State Treasurer as provided in  subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to receive proceeds
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 26
of the state bonds described in subsection (1) of this section and that are intended to be repaid in
whole or in part by university revenues or other moneys under the control  of the university on or
after August 14, 2013.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 352.408 is amended to read:
352.408. (1) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ]:
(a) May issue revenue bonds  for any lawful purpose of the university in accordance with ORS
chapter  287A.
(b) May issue under ORS 287A.360 to 287A.380 refunding bonds of the same character and  tenor
as the revenue bonds replaced.
(2) For the purposes of ORS 271.390  and ORS chapter 287A, a  public university listed in ORS
352.002 [ with a governing board ] is a public body.
(3) ORS 287A.150 does not  apply to revenue bonds issued by a  public university listed in ORS
352.002 [ with a governing board ].
(4) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ]:
(a) May grant leases of real property  held by a trustee or lender for a term that ends on the
date on which all amounts  due under the operative documents have been paid, or provision for
payment has been made, or for a term of up to 20 years  after the last scheduled payment under the
operative documents, whichever is sooner. The leases may grant the trustee or lender the right to
evict the university  and exclude the university from possession of the real property for the term of
the lease if the university fails  to pay when due the amounts scheduled to be paid under the oper-
ative documents or otherwise defaults under the operative documents. Upon  default, the trustee or
lender may sublease the real property to third parties  and apply any rents to payments scheduled
to be made under the operative documents.
(b) May not mortgage, pledge or grant a security interest in, or  otherwise encumber, real or
personal property that has been pledged or leased to provide security for, or acquired,  constructed,
improved with, or otherwise directly benefited  by, the proceeds of outstanding state bonds, except
as provided in ORS 352.113 (4).
(5) Revenue bonds and other obligations authorized by this section:
(a) Are revenue bonds or obligations of a political subdivision of the State of Oregon.
(b) Are  not an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Oregon and are not a charge upon re-
venue or property of the State of Oregon, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(c) Are not a charge upon any revenue or property of a public university listed in ORS 352.002
[with a governing board ] unless  the revenue or property is pledged to secure the revenue bonds or
other obligations.
(d) Are  not payable from, and may not be secured by a pledge of or lien on, any amounts a
public university [ with a governing board ] is required to:
(A) Deposit with the State Treasurer pursuant to ORS 352.135 (2); or
(B) Pay to the State Treasurer pursuant to a schedule described in ORS 352.415.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 352.415 is amended to read:
352.415. (1) ORS 352.388 to 352.415  do not impair the obligations, as defined in ORS 286A.100,
or agreements of the State of Oregon or the State Board of Higher Education with respect to  state
bonds issued before August 14,  2013, for the benefit of a public university [ with a governing board ]
listed in ORS 352.002 .
(2) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] shall take all actions
necessary to ensure full compliance with the operative documents executed with respect  to state
bonds issued before, on or after August 14, 2013, by the  State Treasurer for the benefit of the public
university [ with a governing board ].
(3) The State Treasurer,  in consultation with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
shall at least annually provide a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a  governing board ]
a schedule of outstanding state bonds  and other obligations for which the university must pay, in-
cluding the payment dates and amounts, or methods for determining the amounts. To prepare the
schedule, the State Treasurer may request and rely upon information produced  by one or more
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 27
universities with a governing board  or a shared services enterprise of the universities that provides
services related to debt management. The schedule must include amounts sufficient to pay principal,
interest and premium, if any, on the state bonds, and to pay administrative  and other costs of the
State of Oregon  that are related to the state bonds or other obligations. If the State Treasurer is-
sues state bonds for  the benefit of a public university [ with a governing board ] on or after August
14, 2013, that are intended to be repaid in whole or in part  by university revenues or other moneys
under the control of the university, the  schedule shall be amended to include such state bonds and
the amounts to be  paid by the university. In the absence of manifest error, the schedule provided
by the State Treasurer to a public university [ with a governing board ] is binding on the university.
The public university [ with a governing board ] shall pay the amounts specified in the schedule pro-
vided by the State Treasurer on or before the dates specified in the schedule  from the legally
available revenue of the university  and on a pari passu basis with the payment of any revenue bonds
of the university issued pursuant to ORS 352.408.
(4) At the request  of the State Treasurer, a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a
governing board ] shall provide the State Treasurer with periodic cash flow projections and other
information that allow the State Treasurer to  review and approve the sufficiency of the university’s
cash flow to pay amounts specified in the schedule described in subsection (3) of this  section and
to pay amounts owed under loans from state agencies that were funded with the proceeds of state
bonds.
(5) Moneys deposited with the State  Treasurer or the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services in a debt service reserve account or otherwise for the portion  of the debt service associ-
ated with obligations entered into before August 14, 2013, for the benefit of a public university
listed in ORS 352.002 [with a governing board ] must remain with the  State Treasurer or the Oregon
Department of  Administrative Services until the obligations have been retired or defeased. Earnings
on moneys described in this subsection must be credited to  the account or fund in which the moneys
are held.
(6) The principal, interest, premium, if any, and any issuance costs  of state bonds issued before,
on or after August 14, 2013, for the  benefit of a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a
governing board ], and  any related credit enhancement device or interest rate exchange agreement,
shall be paid from the sources identified in the laws and operative documents authorizing  the state
bonds. The public university [ with a governing board ] for  which the state bonds were issued shall
pay any other expenses and liabilities, including, but  not limited to, legal expenses arising from an
inquiry, audit or other action by a federal or state regulatory body, unless  the expense or liability
results solely from the negligence or willful misconduct of a state agency.
(7) Pursuant to  ORS chapter 180, on behalf of the State Treasurer or any other state agency,
the Attorney General shall appear, commence, prosecute or defend any action, suit, matter,  cause
or proceeding arising from  any state bond issued for the benefit of a public university listed in ORS
352.002 [ with a  governing board ] and any related credit enhancement device or interest rate ex-
change  agreement.  As soon as practicable after a governing board is established by a public uni-
versity pursuant to ORS 352.054, the university [ with a  governing board ] and the State Treasurer
shall enter into an  agreement that addresses reimbursement of reasonable costs and expenses asso-
ciated with the legal representation of the State Treasurer in  connection with state bonds issued for
the benefit of the public university [ with a governing board ] before, on or after August  14, 2013, and
any other topic necessary for the Department of Justice to provide legal representation to the State
Treasurer in connection with state bonds issued for the benefit of the public university [ with a
governing board ] and to provide  representation related to funds and accounts or services provided
under ORS 352.135.
(8) A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] shall assume responsi-
bility for the indemnity and defense of university officers, agents and  employees with regard to, as
applicable, claims asserted and actions commenced in connection with state bonds issued  for the
benefit of the public university [ with a governing board ].
SECTION 31.
 ORS 352.442 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 28
352.442. A public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] may, in  its dis-
cretion, accept financial  assistance and grants, either in the form of money or labor, from the United
States or any of its agencies, subject to the terms and conditions thereof, regardless of any laws of
this state in  conflict with the regulations of the federal government with respect thereto, and may
also accept from others any donation or grant of land, to be taken  and held in the name of the State
of Oregon, acting by  and through the governing board, or gift of money or other valuable gift or
thing, for any of the purposes contemplated by Article XI-F(1) and Article XI-G  of the Oregon Con-
stitution and  ORS 352.157 to 352.171. Unless enjoined by the terms or conditions of any such gift
or grant, the governing board may convert the same, or  any of them, into money, through sale or
disposal thereof.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 352.450 is amended to read:
352.450. (1) The Public University Fund is  established in the State Treasury, separate and dis-
tinct from the General Fund. Any interest or other investment income derived from moneys in the
Public University Fund is credited to the fund.
(2) Except for moneys otherwise designated by  statute or federal law, the governing board of
any public university listed in ORS 352.002 may place any or all moneys received by  it into the
Public University Fund. Once deposited in the fund, the moneys of a  public university shall be
commingled with other moneys in the fund and are  fungible, except to the extent they may be sep-
arately accounted for by the public university designated under subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(3)(a) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002 that choose to participate in the  Public Univer-
sity Fund  shall, by agreement or other structure authorized by law, designate the participating
public university responsible for the Public University Fund and  identify any and all obligations
necessary for a  participating public university listed in ORS 352.002 to serve as the designated re-
sponsible party under this subsection.
(b) The participating public universities shall inform the State Treasurer of the designated
public university responsible for the Public  University Fund. The participating public universities
may change which participating public university is responsible for the Public University Fund.
(c) The State Treasurer may conclusively rely on a written instruction from the public univer-
sities as to the designated public university responsible for the fund.
(d) The designated  public university shall inform the State Treasurer of the personnel authorized
to provide instructions to the State  Treasurer with respect to moneys in the fund. The State
Treasurer may rely  on instructions from the authorized personnel of the designated public university
related to the deposit, withdrawal, investment, transfer, borrowing or lending of moneys in the  fund.
The State Treasurer is not responsible for or liable to the public universities for any error or
omission in the instructions the State Treasurer receives from the designated public university.
(4) All moneys in  the Public University Fund are continuously appropriated to the public uni-
versity responsible for the Public University Fund, to be used only in a manner  consistent with the
agreement or other structure authorized by law as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The moneys in the Public University Fund may be invested as provided in  ORS 293.701 to
293.857.
(6) Public  universities that participate in the Public University Fund may, by agreement or other
structure authorized by law, direct  the public university designated under subsection (3)(a) of this
section to establish  accounts and subaccounts within the fund when the participating public uni-
versities determine that accounts or subaccounts are necessary or desirable. Except when  other-
wise specified by a statute establishing an account, the participating public universities or, as
appropriate, the designated public  university, may credit any interest or income derived from mon-
eys in the fund to any account or subaccount within the fund.
(7) Public universities  that participate in the Public University Fund or, as appropriate, the
public university designated under subsection (3)(a) of this section,  shall keep a record of all moneys
deposited into the fund. The record shall  indicate by separate cumulative accounts and subaccounts
the sources from which the  moneys are derived and the individual activity or program against which
each withdrawal is charged.
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 29
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, public universities that participate in  the Public
University Fund or, as appropriate, the public university designated under subsection (3)(a)  of this
section, may transfer or  lend the moneys in the fund to other participating public universities listed
in ORS 352.002. The Public University Fund may be a borrowing fund for  purposes of ORS 293.205
to 293.225 and may borrow from the Oregon Short Term Fund established in ORS  293.728 or other
state funds. Subject to the limitations of Article XI, section 7, of the  Oregon Constitution, the
Public University Fund may be a lending fund for purposes of ORS 293.205  to 293.225 and may lend
moneys to other state funds. The public university  designated under subsection (3)(a) of this section
shall be the relevant state agency or department for  whom the State Treasurer may transfer funds
or with whom the State Treasurer may enter into an agreement pursuant to ORS 293.205 to  293.225.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ORS 293.169, 293.171, 293.353, 293.406,  293.450,
293.455, 293.460 and 293.465 to 293.485 apply  to moneys in the Public University Fund and to checks,
warrants or electronic funds transfers from or  to the fund. For purposes of ORS 293.169, 293.171,
293.353, 293.406, 293.450, 293.455, 293.460 and 293.465 to 293.485:
(a) The public university designated under subsection (3)(a) of this section  is the relevant state
agency or department; and
(b) The personnel of the designated public  university authorized to provide instructions to the
State Treasurer are the relevant state officers.
(10)(a) The State Treasurer  may establish separate or commingled funds, or establish separate
or commingled accounts within funds established under this subsection. The  State Treasurer may
establish separate or commingled accounts within other  funds in the State Treasury to receive, hold,
keep, manage or invest moneys of a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing
board] pursuant to any agreements entered into by the State Treasurer and  the university under
ORS 352.135. The moneys in a fund or account established under this subsection may be  invested
as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857 and any interest or other investment income derived from  the
fund or account shall be credited to the fund or account.  All moneys held in a fund or account es-
tablished under this subsection are  continuously appropriated to the relevant public university [ with
a governing board ] that has entered into an agreement with the  State Treasurer under ORS 352.135
for the purpose  of carrying out the powers and duties of the public university [ with a governing
board] or the purposes for which the moneys were donated.
(b) Except for moneys held to provide for the payment of state  bonds and other state obligations
described in ORS 352.089 (4), a public university listed in ORS  352.002 [ with a governing board ]
may transfer or lend  the moneys held in the State Treasury pursuant to any agreements entered into
under ORS 352.135 to other public universities listed in ORS 352.002. A fund or account  in the State
Treasury that holds moneys  of a public university [ with a governing board ] pursuant to an agree-
ment entered into under ORS 352.135 may be  a borrowing fund for purposes of ORS 293.205 to
293.225 and may borrow  from the Oregon Short Term Fund established in ORS 293.728 or other state
funds. Subject to the limitations of Article XI, section 7, of the Oregon Constitution, a fund  or ac-
count in the State Treasury that holds moneys  of a public university [ with a governing board ] pur-
suant to an agreement entered into under ORS  352.135 may be a lending fund for purposes of ORS
293.205 to 293.225 and may lend moneys to other state funds. The public university [ with a governing
board] that has entered into an  agreement with the State Treasurer under ORS 352.135 is the rele-
vant state agency or department for whom  the State Treasurer may transfer funds or with whom the
State Treasurer may enter into an agreement pursuant to ORS 293.205 to 293.225.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ORS 293.169, 293.171, 293.353, 293.406,  293.450,
293.455, 293.460 and  293.465 to 293.485 apply to moneys received, held, kept, managed or invested
by the State Treasurer for a public university listed in ORS 352.002  [ with a governing board ] pur-
suant to an agreement  entered into under ORS 352.135 and to checks, warrants or electronic funds
transfers from or to any funds or accounts established pursuant to this  subsection. For purposes of
ORS 293.169, 293.171, 293.353, 293.406, 293.450, 293.455, 293.460 and 293.465 to 293.485:
(A) The public university [ with a governing board ] that has entered  into an agreement with the
State Treasurer under ORS 352.135 is the relevant state agency or department; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 30
(B) The personnel of the public university [ with a governing board ] authorized to provide  in-
structions to the State Treasurer are the relevant state officers.
Passed by Senate April 24, 2017
Repassed by Senate June 12, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 54 (SB 54-B) Page 31